North Dakota, session 69, HB1179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - PAID TIME OFF FOR FACULTY OF
AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative
management shall consider studying requiring each institution of higher education to provide
paid time off to faculty members appointed to at least a twelve-month term of employment. The
study must include a comprehensive review of in-state and out-of-state leave policies for
institutions of higher education. The legislative management shall report its findings and
recommendations, together with any legislation necessary to implement the recommendations,
to the seventieth legislative assembly.
Page No. 1 25.0633.02000